Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1081
Class IV school district; school tax; purposes enumerated; tax levy; restriction.

The tax for bond interest for a Class IV school district shall in no one year exceed such amount as will, with the balance on hand in such fund, be sufficient to pay the bond interest as it becomes due. The tax for the bond sinking fund shall not exceed a sum sufficient to pay the principal of such bonds as it becomes due or to pay each year such number of the bonds as will retire them all at or before their maturity. The amount of tax levied for the retirement plan fund and for general school purposes shall be without restriction, except that the aggregate school tax levy for all purposes shall not in any one year exceed such rate as shall be necessary to provide the sums reported in the estimate returned in accordance with section 79-1085. The amount of tax levied for the building and equipment fund shall not in any one year exceed fourteen cents on each one hundred dollars within the limits provided in section 77-3442.

Laws 1917, c. 225, § 21, p. 555;

Laws 1919, c. 150, § 2, p. 336;

Laws 1921, c. 83, § 2, p. 298;

C.S.1922, § 6630;

Laws 1923, c. 65, § 1, p. 195;

C.S.1929, § 79-2621;

Laws 1931, c. 144, § 1, p. 393;

Laws 1937, c. 176, § 8, p. 701;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 79-2621;

R.S.1943, § 79-2621;

Laws 1947, c. 295, § 1, p. 909;

Laws 1949, c. 270, § 1, p. 886;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 247, p. 774;

Laws 1951, c. 283, § 1, p. 949;

Laws 1953, c. 306, § 1, p. 1021;

Laws 1953, c. 287, § 85, p. 979;

Laws 1955, c. 318, § 1, p. 983;

Laws 1957, c. 353, § 2, p. 1200;

Laws 1959, c. 405, § 1, p. 1367;

Laws 1963, c. 489, § 3, p. 1562;

Laws 1967, c. 543, § 1, p. 1785;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 239;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-904;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 727;

Laws 2000, LB 968, § 82.